Utah statutes.
53-7-103.   State Fire Marshal Division -- Creation -- State fire marshal -- Appointment, qualifications, duties, and compensation.

(1)  There is created within the department the State Fire Marshal Division.

(2) (a)  The director of the division is the state fire marshal, who shall be appointed by the commissioner upon the recommendation of the Utah Fire Prevention Board created in Section 53-7-203 and with the approval of the governor.

(b)  The state fire marshal is the executive and administrative head of the division, and shall be qualified by experience and education to:

(i)  enforce the state fire code;

(ii)  enforce rules made under this chapter; and

(iii)  perform the duties prescribed by the commissioner.

(3)  The state fire marshal acts under the supervision and control of the commissioner and may be removed from the position at the will of the commissioner.

(4)  The state fire marshal shall:

(a)  enforce the state fire code and rules made under this chapter in accordance with Section 53-7-104;

(b)  complete the duties assigned by the commissioner;

(c)  examine plans and specifications for school buildings, as required by Section 53A-20-104;

(d)  approve criteria established by the state superintendent for building inspectors;

(e)  promote and support injury prevention public education programs; and

(f)  perform all other duties provided in this chapter.

(5)  The state fire marshal shall receive compensation as provided by Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.



Amended by Chapter 340, 2011 General Session

